Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB194.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXII-CMENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONALSTUDENT LOAN FORGIVENESS PROGRAMSection 2201-C. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617181920 "Agency." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency."Mental health field." A profession associated with completing any of the fields of study enumerated under section 2202-C(b)(2)."Program." The Mental Health Professional Student Loan Forgiveness Program established under section 2202-C(a)."Qualified applicant." An individual who meets all of the criteria under section 2202-C(b)."Recipient." A qualified applicant who is selected by the agency for participation in the program.Section 2202-C. Mental Health Professional Student Loan Forgiveness Program.(a) Establishment.--The Mental Health Professional Student Loan Forgiveness Program is established within the agency.(b) Qualifications.--To qualify for the program, an applicant must make an application to the agency and meet all of the following criteria:(1) Be a resident of this Commonwealth.(2) Have completed at least one-half of the credit hours needed to earn an undergraduate or master's academic degree or diploma in social work, counseling, psychology, psychiatry, nursing or another degree in the human services field.(3) Have a recommendation from the faculty of the employer of which the applicant is employed or, if the applicant is enrolled in coursework for a degree listed in paragraph (2), from a professor under whom the applicant has taken coursework.(4) Be employed to, or have been hired to, work in the 20250HB0194PN0141 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mental health field focusing on early childhood through adolescence.(c) Program components.--(1) An application must be made to the agency on or before the deadline for submittal of the application as established by the agency for participation in the program.(2) The application shall contain all of the information required under subsection (b) and demonstrate that the applicant satisfies the required criteria.(3) A qualified applicant may not submit another application after satisfactorily completing the program, withdrawing from the program or failing to satisfactorily comply with the program requirements as determined by the agency.(4) A recipient shall be eligible for a financial award payment by the agency of a portion of the debt incurred by the recipient through the agency-administered Guaranteed Stafford or Consolidation Loan Programs if the recipient:(i) graduates from a university that is part of the State System of Higher Education with a minimum B average grade; and(ii) enters into a contract with the agency that requires the recipient to remain employed in the mental health field focusing on early childhood through adolescence for at least seven years.(5) The agency may grant an award to the recipient of up to $22,500 which may be applied directly by the agency to the recipient's agency-administered Guaranteed Stafford or Consolidation Loan Program debt balance or, for a recipient who is currently enrolled at the university, the award may be 20250HB0194PN0141 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 direct cash assistance.(6) Payment shall be made in accordance with the procedures established by the agency.(7) Financial award payment may not be made by the agency, and an applicant may not be considered a qualified applicant or participate in the program unless the applicant contracts for the following terms with the Commonwealth through the agency:(i) The applicant must be employed in the mental health field focusing on early childhood through adolescence for a period of no less than one year.(ii) The applicant permits the agency to determine compliance with the work requirement and all other terms or requirements deemed necessary by the agency to perform its obligations under this article.(iii) Upon the applicant's death or total and permanent disability, the agency nullifies the service obligation of the applicant.(iv) If the applicant is convicted of or pleads guilty or no contest to a felony, the agency may terminate the applicant's service in the program and demand repayment of the amount of the financial award as of the date of the conviction.(v) If the applicant fails to begin or complete the obligations contracted for, the applicant shall pay to the agency the amount of the financial award received under the terms of the contract.(vi) Providing false information or misrepresentation on the application or verification of service shall be deemed a default under the contract.20250HB0194PN0141 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) The agency shall determine the time of the default.(8) A recipient shall certify annually to the agency that the recipient continues to meet the qualifications for participation in the program for each year that the recipient continues to participate in the program.(d) Limitation.--The agency may not approve a financial award under this article for a tuition loan that is in default at the time of application.Section 2203-C. Tuition payment awards.(a) Employment.--The agency shall make a tuition payment award under this article to a recipient who:(1) works in and has received a satisfactory rating from an employer in the mental health field focusing on early childhood through adolescence; or(2) has been hired by an employer in the mental health field focusing on early childhood through adolescence.(b) Documentation.--A recipient shall submit documentation of eligibility as the agency may require, including documentation to indicate employment and grades received while a student at a university that is part of the State System of Higher Education. The documentation shall be presented to the agency in the form of a letter from the recipient's employer stating that the recipient:(1) is employed by an employer in the mental health field focusing on early childhood through adolescence; and(2) performs duties in a satisfactory manner.Section 2204-C. Tax applicability.A financial award payment under the program shall not be considered taxable income for the purposes of Article III of the 20250HB0194PN0141 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 2205-C. Student financial aid.This article shall be subject to 22 Pa. Code Ch. 121 (relating to student financial aid).Section 2206-C. Agency duties.The agency shall administer the program and shall adopt regulations, policies, procedures and forms as are necessary to implement the program, which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this article.Section 2207-C. Appropriation.The sum of $50,000,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the agency for the purpose of making tuition payment awards to recipients under this article. In the event that funding is insufficient to fully fund all eligible applicants, tuition payment awards shall be made to recipients on a first-come, first-served basis until funding has been exhausted.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0194PN0141 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718